Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1420
Report; made public; when; transfer of evidence.

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(g) of section 29-1406, the report of the grand jury shall not be made public except when the report is filed, including indictments, or when required by statute or except that all of the report or a portion thereof may be released if the judge of the district court finds that such a release will exonerate a person or persons who have requested such a release.

(2) A district judge under whose direction a grand jury has been impaneled may, upon good cause shown, transfer to a court of competent jurisdiction in another county or jurisdiction any evidence gathered by the grand jury that offenses have been committed in such other county or jurisdiction.

Laws 1979, LB 524, § 11;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB1000, § 9.

Court approval for the release of grand jury proceedings when there has been a "no true bill" is limited by statute to witnesses and to other courts. In re Grand Jury of Lancaster Cty., 269 Neb. 436, 693 N.W.2d 285 (2005).

Grand jury's report was not authorized for publication and was ordered expunged from the records of the district court. In re Grand Jury of Douglas Cty., 244 Neb. 798, 509 N.W.2d 212 (1993).